Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.528

Standard set of criteria—Medical necessity for substance use disorder treatment—Substance use disorder levels of care—Rules.

For the purposes of promoting standardized training for behavioral health professionals and facilitating communications between behavioral health agencies, executive agencies, managed care organizations, private health plans, and plans offered through the public employees' benefits board, it is the policy of the state to adopt a single standard set of criteria to define medical necessity for substance use disorder treatment and to define substance use disorder levels of care in Washington. The criteria selected must be comprehensive, widely understood and accepted in the field, and based on continuously updated research and evidence. The health care authority and the office of the insurance commissioner must independently review their regulations and practices by January 1, 2021. The health care authority may make rules if necessary to promulgate the selected standard set of criteria.

[ 2020 c 345 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2020 c 345: See note following RCW 41.05.526.